New York, session 2025-2026, S686.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3205-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3205-b. Medical immunization exemption. 1. The school in which a 4 student is attending or will attend shall accept a medical immunization 5 exemption request form containing the information pursuant to subdivi- 6 sion two of this section. The department or any other state agency, 7 board or commission shall not require any other condition or requirement 8 for the medical exemption to immunization or immunizations provided for 9 in this section for school admission. 10 2. The form accepted by the school shall contain the following infor- 11 mation: 12 (a) Name(s) of parent, parents or guardian; 13 (b) Name of child; 14 (c) Student's birthdate; 15 (d) Student's residential address; 16 (e) School name and district; 17 (f) The medical reason, diagnosis and/or condition of which deems 18 immunization detrimental to the student's health; and 19 (g) The signature of a licensed physician, physician's assistant or 20 nurse practitioner, their medical license number and practice affil- 21 iation declaring: I hereby certify that immunization against (poliomyel- 22 itis, mumps, measles, diptheria, rubella, varicella, Haemophilus 23 influenzae type b (Hib), pertussis, tetanus, pneumococcal disease, 24 influenza, meningococcal disease and hepatitis B) may be detrimental to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02758-01-5 S. 686 2 1 the child's health. The date and signature of the physician, nurse prac- 2 titioner or physician's assistant shall appear here. This certification, 3 once provided to the student's school, shall serve as an exemption to 4 section 2164 of the public health law. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 6 have become a law.